Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-337
Minibike, defined.

(1) Minibike means a two-wheel motor vehicle that:

(a) Has a total wheel and tire diameter of less than fourteen inches;

(b) Has an engine-rated capacity of less than forty-five cubic centimeters displacement;

(c) Has an engine power output of less than three horsepower;

(d) Has an engine-rated capacity of less than two thousand two hundred thirty-eight watts; or

(e) Was primarily designed by the manufacturer for off-road use only.

(2) Minibike shall not include an electric personal assistive mobility device.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 37;

Laws 2025, LB97, § 17.